Oklahoma, session 2025, SB733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 388.1 of Title 22, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. When an arrested person is held in custody subsequent to


an arrest, an indictment or information shall be filed by the state


within five (5) business days of the arrest.


2. In counties with a population of more than five hundred


thousand (500,000) according to the latest Federal Decennial Census,


when an arrested person is held in custody subsequent to an arrest,


an indictment or information shall be filed by the state within ten


(10) business days of the arrest.

Req. No. 296 Page 1


B. The state may move to extend the five-day or ten-day period


required by subsection A of this section to file an indictment or


information upon a showing of good cause.


C. 1. If the indictment or information has not been filed upon


the expiration of the five-day or ten-day period required by


subsection A of this section to file an indictment or information,


the arrested person may move for release from custody subject to an


own recognizance bond as provided for in Section 1108.1 of Title 22


of the Oklahoma Statutes. The expiration of the time limit to file


an indictment or information shall be prima facie grounds for the


release of an arrested person on an own recognizance bond subject to


the limitations on release set forth in subsection E of Section


1108.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes or as otherwise provided


by law.


2. An arrested person may move for release on his or her own


recognizance upon the expiration of the period to file an indictment


or information even if the arrested person has already had bail set


by the court as provided for in Section 1105.2 of Title 22 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-296 TEK 1/19/2025 5:42:13 AM





Req. No. 296 Page 2